Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Certification.

Sec. 08.87.100.
Certificate required.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor who

does not hold a certificate issued by the board, whose certificate is suspended or revoked, or whose certificate has lapsed or terminated, and holds out as a certified real estate appraiser in any way, orally or in writing, directly or by implication;

is certified as a residential real estate appraiser and holds out as certified to appraise real estate other than

residential real property of four or fewer units; or

residential real property of 12 or fewer units when a net income capitalization analysis is not required by the terms of the appraisal assignment and a secondary mortgage market form is used; or

is certified as an institutional real estate appraiser and

holds out as certified to appraise real estate other than

residential real property of four or fewer units having a transaction value of less than $1,000,000; or

commercial property having a transaction value of less than $250,000;

holds out as performing real estate appraisal services for a fee or for the public at large;

accepts a fee for real estate appraisal services other than for services conducted as a full-time employee of a financial institution with offices in the state and other than a salary received as a full-time employee of the financial institution; or

performs a real estate appraisal for other than the portfolio of the financial institution for which the person is employed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 1992)

Sec. 08.87.110.
General, residential, and institutional real estate appraiser certificates.

The board shall issue a general real estate appraiser certificate to a person who presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the person

has successfully completed classroom instruction in subjects related to real estate appraisal, as required by the board in regulation, from an appraisal organization or academic institution approved by the board;

has successfully completed classroom instruction related to standards of professional practice as a real estate appraiser, as required by the board in regulation;

successfully completes an examination prescribed by the board;

has not been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude; and

has paid the required fees.

The board shall issue a residential real estate appraiser certificate to a person who presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the person

meets the requirements of (a)(2) — (5) of this section; and

has successfully completed classroom instruction in subjects related to residential real estate appraisal, as required by the board in regulation, from an appraisal organization or academic institution approved by the board.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, the board shall issue a general real estate appraiser or residential real estate appraiser certificate to a person who does not reside in this state and who

applies on the form required by the department;

pays the required fee; and

holds a valid certificate or license from a state whose requirements for real estate appraiser certification or licensing

meet or exceed the appraiser certification standards in this chapter; and

comply with 12 U.S.C. 3331 — 3351 (Title XI, Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989), as amended by 12 U.S.C. 5301 — 5641 (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act).

A certificate may be issued to a natural person only. A certified real estate appraiser may sign an appraisal report on behalf of a corporation, partnership, firm, or group practice.

The board shall issue an institutional real estate appraiser certificate to a person who presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the person meets the educational and testing requirements of 12 U.S.C. 3331 — 3351 (Title XI, Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989), as amended by 12 U.S.C. 5301 — 5641 (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act) and as implemented by the board, and that the person is a full-time employee of a financial institution with offices in the state. A person receiving certification under this subsection may perform an appraisal only

for and as an employee of a financial institution with offices in the state;

for the financial institution’s own portfolio; and

of

commercial property with a transaction value of less than $250,000; or

residential property of four or fewer units having a transaction value of less than $1,000,000.

A certificate issued under (e) of this section terminates when the person certified leaves the full-time employment of the financial institution with offices in the state for whom the person was employed when the certificate was issued.

A person certified under (e) of this section as an institutional real estate appraiser may not perform real estate appraisal services for the general public or for a fee other than the salary the person receives as a full-time employee of a financial institution with offices in the state.

Notwithstanding (a) — (c) of this section, the board may issue a general or residential real estate appraiser certificate to a person who does not meet the requirements of (a) — (c) of this section and who

applies on a form required by the department;

pays the required fee; and

successfully completes the National Uniform Licensing and Certification Examination issued or endorsed by the Appraiser Qualifications Board of the Appraisal Foundation, has previous real estate appraiser experience acceptable to the board, or successfully completes courses approved by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am §§ 3, 4 ch 42 SLA 1992; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 88 SLA 1994; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 42 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of subsection (h), see sec. 10(b), ch. 42, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 70, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, in (e), inserted “, as amended by 12 U.S.C. 5301 - 5641 (Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act) and” preceding “as implemented by the board”, and made a stylistic change; added (h).

Sec. 08.87.120.
Continuing education requirements for renewal of certificate.

The board may not renew a certificate issued under this chapter unless the person applying for renewal presents evidence satisfactory to the board that the person has, within the two years preceding the application for renewal, attended classroom instruction, as required by the board in regulation, in courses or seminars that have received the approval of the board.

The board may grant credit toward some or all of the requirements of (a) of this section to a person who has

successfully completed a program of study determined by the board to be equivalent for continuing education purposes to a course or seminar approved by the board for continuing education credit; or

participated, other than as a student, in educational programs that related to real estate analysis or real property appraisal theory, practice, or technique, including teaching, program development, and preparation of textbooks, monographs, articles, and other instructional materials.

The board shall adopt regulations on continuing education to ensure that persons applying for renewal of certificates have thorough knowledge of current theories, practices, and techniques of real estate analysis and appraisal. The regulations must provide for

procedures for the sponsor of a course or seminar to apply for board approval for continuing education credit; the regulations must require the sponsor to show that claimed attendance at a course or seminar can be verified; and

procedures for evaluating equivalency claims for applicants for certificate renewal under (b) of this section.

In considering whether to approve courses and seminars under this section, the board shall give special consideration to courses, seminars, and other appraisal education programs developed by or under the auspices of organizations or associations of professional real estate appraisers that are utilized by those organizations or associations for the purposes of awarding real estate appraisal designations or of indicating compliance with the continuing education requirements of the organizations or associations.

An amendment or repeal of a regulation adopted by the board under this section may not operate to deprive a person holding a certificate under this chapter of credit toward renewal of the person’s certificate for a course of instruction or seminar that had been completed by the person before the amendment or repeal of the regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 88 SLA 1994; am § 31 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and examination requirements, see 12 AAC 70, art. 1.

For continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 70, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (e), substituted “this section may” for “this section shall”.